Maryland, session 2026, HB0977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 9–905.1(E) OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, § 9–905.1 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(15) Act or omission that relates to a residential building and that is
chargeable as a misdemeanor under or otherwise violates a provision of the Energy
Conservation Building Standards Act, Title 7, Subtitle 4 of the Public Utilities Article.
Article – State Government
[9–905.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Advertisement” means:
(i) a written or printed communication made for the purpose of
soliciting business for veterans benefits appeals services;
(ii) a directory listing for a person that is offering veterans benefits
appeals services; or

HOUSE BILL 977 3
(iii) a radio, television, computer network or airwave, or electronic
transmission that solicits business for or promotes a person offering veterans benefits
appeals services.
(3) “Veterans benefits appeals services” means any services that a veteran
might reasonably require in order to appeal a denial of federal, state, or local veterans
benefits, including denials of disability, limited income, home loan, insurance, education
and training, health care, burial and memorial, and dependent and survivor benefits.
(4) “Veterans benefits services” means any services a veteran or a family
member of a veteran might reasonably use in order to obtain federal, state, or local veterans
benefits.
(b) (1) Before entering into an agreement with an individual for the provision
of veterans benefits services or veterans benefits appeals services, a person who charges a
fee for those services shall:
(i) provide a written disclosure statement to each individual; and
(ii) obtain the individual’s signature on the written disclosure
statement acknowledging that the individual understands the disclosure statement.
(2) The written disclosure statement shall:
(i) be on a form approved by the Secretary; and
(ii) state that veterans benefits services and veterans benefits
appeals services are offered at no cost by the Department and other veterans services
organizations accredited by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
(c) A person who charges a fee for providing veterans benefits appeals services
shall provide in any advertisement for appeals services notice that appeals services are also
offered at no cost by the Department and other veterans services organizations accredited
by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
(d) (1) A person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to a civil
penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation.
(2) Civil penalties shall be in an amount ordered by the District Court in
an action brought by the Attorney General.
(3) Each day a violation continues is a separate violation.
(4) Any civil penalty collected shall be deposited in the Maryland Veterans
Trust Fund.]
9–905.1.

HOUSE BILL 977
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMPENSATION” MEANS PAYMENT OF MONEY, A THING OF
VALUE, OR AN ECONOMIC BENEFIT CONFERRED ON OR RECEIVED BY ANY PERSON
IN RETURN FOR SERVICES RENDERED OR TO BE RENDERED BY A PERSON.
(3) “V.A. ACCREDITED” MEANS AUTHORIZED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS TO PROVIDE SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
38 C.F.R. § 14.629.
(4) “VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER” MEANS A CLAIM OR AN APPEAL
AFFECTING AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS FILED OR EXPRESSED AN INTENT TO FILE A
CLAIM FOR ANY BENEFIT, PROGRAM, SERVICE, COMMODITY, FUNCTION, OR STATUS
TO WHICH ENTITLEMENT IS DETERMINED UNDER THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS
ADMINISTERED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE, OR THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND
MILITARY FAMILIES PERTAINING TO VETERANS, THEIR DEPENDENTS, THEIR
SURVIVORS, AND ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE FOR SUCH BENEFITS.
(B) (1) A PERSON THAT IS NOT V.A. ACCREDITED THAT IS SEEKING TO
RECEIVE COMPENSATION FOR PREPARING, PRESENTING, OR PROSECUTING A
VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER OR ADVISING, CONSULTING, OR ASSISTING AN
INDIVIDUAL WITH A VETERANS BENEFITS MATTER SHALL, BEFORE RENDERING ANY
SERVICES, ENTER INTO A WRITTEN FEE AGREEMENT, SIGNED BY BOTH PARTIES,
THAT ADHERES TO ALL CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN 38 C.F.R. § 14.636.
(2) THE FEE AGREEMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING NOTICE
IN CONSPICUOUS, BOLD, AND UNDERSCORED TYPE:
“THIS BUSINESS IS NOT SPONSORED BY, OR AFFILIATED WITH, THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS OR THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES, OR ANY OTHER FEDERALLY CHARTERED
VETERANS’ SERVICE ORGANIZATION. OTHER ORGANIZATIONS, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES,
A LOCAL VETERANS’ SERVICE ORGANIZATION, AND OTHER FEDERALLY CHARTERED
VETERANS’ SERVICE ORGANIZATIONS, MAY BE ABLE TO PROVIDE YOU WITH THIS
SERVICE FREE OF CHARGE. PRODUCTS OR SERVICES OFFERED BY THIS BUSINESS
ARE NOT NECESSARILY ENDORSED BY ANY OF THESE ORGANIZATIONS. YOU MAY
QUALIFY FOR OTHER VETERANS’ BENEFITS BEYOND THE BENEFITS FOR WHICH YOU
ARE RECEIVING SERVICES HERE.

HOUSE BILL 977 5
THE NEAREST VETERANS SERVICE OFFICE TO YOUR HOME OF RECORD IS
LOCATED AT: (ADDRESS, PHONE NUMBER, AND CONTACT INFORMATION).”.
(3) THE NOTICE IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ALSO
BE DELIVERED ORALLY TO THE INDIVIDUAL AT THE TIME THE FEE AGREEMENT IS
ENTERED INTO AND THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL SIGN AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL UNDERSTANDS THE NOTICE.
(C) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS ENTERED INTO A WRITTEN AGREEMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION DIES BEFORE A CLAIM IS
PROCESSED FOR WHICH THE AGREEMENT WAS ENTERED INTO, THE PERSON
PROVIDING THE SERVICE FOR COMPENSATION MAY NOT CHARGE OR COLLECT ANY
FEE OR DEBT OWED IN CONNECTION WITH THAT SERVICE.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION:
(1) IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) IS SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(E) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THE DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENT IN
SUBSECTION (B)(2) AND (3) OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) A CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT MORE THAN $10,000 FOR EACH
VIOLATION; AND
(II) A 1–YEAR BAN FROM OFFERING SERVICES RELATING TO
VETERANS BENEFITS MATTERS IN THE STATE.
(2) CIVIL PENALTIES SHALL BE IN AN AMOUNT ORDERED BY THE
DISTRICT COURT IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(3) EACH DAY A VIOLATION CONTINUES IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
(F) ANY CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY COLLECTED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN
THE MARYLAND VETERANS TRUST FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.